Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2628
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Act:

(1) Capacity means the number of children receiving care or services through an approved program;

(2) Community foundation means a tax-exempt, nonprofit, autonomous, nonsectarian, philanthropic institution supported by the public with the long-term goals of:

(a) Building permanent, component funds established by many separate donors to carry out charitable interests; and

(b) Supporting the broad-based charitable interests and benefiting the residents of a defined geographic area;

(3) Department means the Department of Economic Development;

(4) Eligible recipient means:

(a) Any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, city of the first class, city of the second class, village, or county;

(b) Any nonprofit organization, including any community foundation; or

(c) Any other entity determined appropriate in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department;

(5) License-exempt provider means any approved license-exempt provider enrolled in the child care subsidy program pursuant to sections 68-1202 and 68-1206;

(6) Licensed child care program means a program described in section 71-1911; and

(7) Regional facilitator hub means any entity that provides administrative and technical support to any licensed child care program, including any:

(a) Nonprofit organization; or

(b) Community foundation.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 32.